Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska77-3411
Statutory limitation on budgets; not applicable; when.

Any statutory limitation on the budget, funded by property taxes, of a political subdivision authorized to levy a tax or cause a tax to be levied shall not apply to any such political subdivision which has adopted a tax or budgetary limitation on property taxes by vote of the electors of the political subdivision pursuant to the Local Option Tax Control Act or any home rule charter.

Laws 1978, Spec. Sess., LB 2, § 11;

Laws 1992, LB 1063, § 189;

Laws 1992, Second Spec. Sess., LB 1, § 161.